test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vuaggu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - vuálppu: # ok 
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuálppu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuálpun
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuálpust
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Com:  vuálppoin
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuálputtáá
    vuálppu+N+Ess:  vuálppun
    vuálppu+N+Par:  vuálppud
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuálpuh
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Gen:  vuálpui
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuálpuid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuálppoid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuálpuin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Com:  [vuálpuiguin, vuálpuigijn]
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuálpuittáá


  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuárháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárkkán
    vuárkká+N+Par:  vuárkkád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: vuárhái
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  [vuárháiguin, vuárháigijn]
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuárháittáá

  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Par:  kuávskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: kuávskái
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  [kuávskáiguin, kuávskáiguin]
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávskáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par:  kuáhčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: kuávčái
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  [kuávčáiguin, kuávčáigijn]
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávčáittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miärháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: miärhái
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  [miärháiguin, miärháigijn]
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miärháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riävskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Par:  riävskád
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: riävskái
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  [riävskáiguin, riävskáigijn]
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riävskáittáá


  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuástáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Par:  vuástád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: vuástái
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  [vuástáiguin, vuástáigijn]
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuástáittáá

  Noun - čiähá:
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom:  čiähá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen:  čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Acc:  čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc:  čiävást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com:  čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Sg+Abe:  čiäváttáá
    čiähá+N+Ess:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom:  čiäváh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: čiävái
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc:  čiäváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill:  čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc:  čiäváin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com:  [čiäváiguin, čiäváigijn]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe:  čiäváittáá

  Noun - puánnjá:
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Nom:  puánnjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Gen:  puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Acc: puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Ill:  puánján
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Loc:  puánjást
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Com:  puánnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Abe:  puánjáttáá
    puánnjá+N+Ess:  puánnján
    puánnjá+N+Par: puánnjád
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Nom:  puánjáh
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Gen: puánjái
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Acc:  puánjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Ill:  puánnjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Loc:  puánjáin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Com:  [puánjáiguin, puánjáigijn]
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Abe:  puánjáittáá
  
  Noun - pieggâ:
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Nom: pieggâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Gen: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Acc: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Ill: piegân
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Loc: piegâst
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Com: pieggáin
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Abe: piegâttáá
    pieggâ+N+Ess: pieggân
    pieggâ+N+Par: pieggâd
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Nom: piegah
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Gen: piegâi
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Acc: piegâid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Ill: pieggáid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Loc: piegâin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Com: [piegâiguin, piegâigijn]
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Abe: piegâittáá
  
